New Jersey, session 221, S512.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.18A:4-7 is amended to read as follows: 18A:4-7.  The [state board] State Board of Education shall hold public meetings at least once in each month at such times as its rules may prescribe and at such other times and such places within the [state] State as in its judgment may be necessary, but no meeting shall commence later than eight P.M. A member of the State Board of Education shall only be recorded as present if the member attends the meeting in person, except as may be otherwise determined during a state of emergency declared by the Governor. All public meetings of the State Board of Education, including any portion of a public meeting designated for public comment, shall be accessible to the public both in person and virtually. A link for virtual access to the meeting shall be publicly available on the State Board of Educations Internet website. For any public meeting in which the State Board of Education accepts public comment, members of the public shall be permitted to make comments by means of remote communication. (cf: N.J.S.18A:4-7) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.